Wisconsin, session 2025, SB92.
do enact as follows:SB92,11Section 1. 943.20 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB92,2,42943.20 (5) Aggregation of values. For purposes of charging and penalty 3determinations under sub. (3) (a) to (cm), the value of property from multiple 4violations committed by the same person in a 6-month period may be aggregated.SB92,25Section 2. 943.50 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB92,2,86943.50 (6) For purposes of charging and penalty determinations under sub. 7(4) (a) to (c), the value of property from multiple violations committed by the same 8person in a 6-month period may be aggregated.SB92,39Section 3. 971.19 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB92,2,1310971.19 (2m) If 2 or more violations of s. 943.20 or 943.50 are prosecuted as a 11single crime as provided in s. 971.36 (5), the trial may be in any county in which any 12of the violations occurred and the prosecutor shall have exclusive jurisdiction over 13the violations.SB92,414Section 4. 971.36 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB92,2,1615971.36 (5) In any case involving aggregated acts under s. 943.20 (5) or 943.50 16(6), notwithstanding sub. (3), the acts may be prosecuted as a single crime.SB92,2,1717